Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1409
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; offer ongoing support.

Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall offer ongoing support to youth after they complete the initial service period. This support may include alumni mentoring programs, periodic check-ins, or additional family resources as youth transition into adulthood or exit from other systems of care.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 9.